Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202647-1204
Pilot program; grant eligibility, application, and audit requirements; funding.

(1) The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice shall administer the pilot program and, in addition to the requirements set out in section 47-1203, develop grant eligibility, application, and audit requirements.

(2) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Regional Mental Health Expansion Pilot Program Act.

(3) The commission shall identify grant funding to carry out the Regional Mental Health Expansion Pilot Program Act.

Laws 2025, LB150, § 4.